Hawaii, session 2026, HB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that school health assistants, pursuant to section 302A-853, Hawaii Revised Statutes, may administer medications to students in public schools.  However, due to vacancies, many schools experience challenges in meeting the needs of students who are prescribed medications or may benefit from receiving medications in emergency situations while on campus. The legislature further finds that school staff acting as volunteers can be an effective substitute after completing training and general instruction in tasks such as correctly interpreting the health care provider's orders; identifying the correct route of administration of medication, either oral or nasal; confirming the correct dosage; administering the medications at the right time; and duly documenting events.  Skilled nursing services such as those that require a license, are out of scope for both school health assistants and trained volunteers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize public school employees or agents who have completed appropriate training to act as volunteer substitutes to administer medications to students consistent with standards applicable to school health assistants. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-853, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "§302A-853 Administration of medication.  (a) School health assistants, and other employees and agents trained by a health care professional employed or contracted by the department, may assist students by administering oral, nasal, and topical medication, and in emergency situations, other premeasured medication; provided that: (1)  If the student receiving the medication is a minor, a parent or guardian requests and authorizes the administration of medication; (2)  The medication has been prescribed by a licensed physician, [as defined in section 334-1,] physician's assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or [by a] other practitioner with prescriptive authority; (3)  The administration of the medication is with the approval of a health care professional within the department, department of health, or health care service as defined in section 323D-2 pursuant to a written agreement with the department; and (4)  The administration of the medication is necessary for the health of the student and for the student's attendance at school." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________